Louisiana, session 2026, HB683.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Code of Civil Procedure Articles 1293(A) and (B) and 1355(B) are hereby
amended and reenacted to read as follows:
Art. 1293. Service by private person
A. When the sheriff has not made service of an original petition or executory
pleading within ten days after receipt of the process or when a return has been made
certifying that the sheriff has been unable to make service, whichever is earlier, on
motion of a party, the court shall appoint a person over the age of majority, not a
party, and residing within the state whom the court deems qualified to perform the
duties required, to make service of process in the same manner as is required of
sheriffs. Service of process made in this manner shall be proved like any other fact
in the case by filing return of service with the court. Any person who is a Louisiana
licensed private investigator shall be presumed qualified to perform the duties
required to make service.
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-715 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 683
B. In serving notice of a summary proceeding as provided by Article 2592
or a subpoena which is related to the proceeding, on motion of a party the court shall
have the discretion to appoint any person over the age of majority, not a party, and
residing within the state, to may make service of process, notices, and subpoenas in
the same manner as is required of sheriffs, without first requiring the sheriff to
attempt service. The party making such a motion shall include the reasons, verified
by affidavit, necessary to forego service by the sheriff, which shall include but not
be limited to the urgent emergency nature of the hearing, knowledge of the present
whereabouts of the person to be served, as well as any other good cause shown.
* * *
Art. 1355. Service of subpoena
* * *
B. Except as otherwise provided by law, when the sheriff has not made
service of a subpoena within five days after its receipt or when a return has been
made certifying that the sheriff has been unable to make service, any person over the
age of majority, not a party, and residing within the state, may make service of the
subpoena in the same manner as is required by the sheriff. Proof of service by a
private person shall be made by filing with the clerk of the court by which the
subpoena is issued a notarized return showing the title of the action and the name of
the court issuing it, the date and manner of service, and the name of the person
served, signed by the person who made the service.